Georgia, session 2025_26, HB633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended in Code Section 21-2-381, relating to making of application
for absentee ballot, determination of eligibility by ballot clerk, furnishing of applications to
colleges and universities, and persons entitled to make application, by revising
subparagraph (a)(1)(B) as follows:
"(B) In the case of an elector residing temporarily out of the county or municipality or
a physically disabled elector residing within the county or municipality, the application
for the elector's absentee ballot may, upon satisfactory proof of relationship, be made
by such elector's mother, father, grandparent, aunt, uncle, sister, brother, spouse, son,
H. B. 633
- 1 -

LC 47 3347
daughter, niece, nephew, grandchild, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, mother-in-law,
father-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law, or caregiver of the age of 18 or over."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 633
- 2 -